Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1091.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Corporal Robert Lee Clampffer Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Robert Lee Clampffer was born September 9, 1947, in Corwells Heights, Bensalem Township, Bucks County.(2) Prior to his military service, Corporal Clampffer graduated from Bensalem High School in 1967 and was a volunteer firefighter at the Eddington Fire Station along with his father and brothers.(3) Corporal Clampffer was an infantryman serving with B Company, 3rd Battalion, 1st Infantry, 11th Infantry Brigade.(4) On May 1, 1968, Corporal Clampffer's unit was on a combat operation in the vicinity of Van Ha, three miles 12345678910111213141516171819 southeast of Mo Duc Airfield, Quang Ngai Province, Republic of Vietnam.(5) On the combat operation, Corporal Clampffer was injured by a booby-trapped 155 mm white phosphorous round.(6) Seriously injured by the blast, Corporal Clampffer was evacuated to a military hospital where he died five days later due to complications of pneumonia.(7) Corporal Clampffer lived on Trenton Road in Hulmeville Borough, Bucks County, just nine houses from the bridge crossing the Neshaminy Creek between the borough and Bensalem Township.(b) Designation.--The bridge identified as Bridge Key 7041, carrying Pennsylvania Route 513 over Neshaminy Creek in Hulmeville Borough, Bucks County, is designated as the Corporal Robert Lee Clampffer Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1091PN1326 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920